Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.040

Notice of taking possession.

Upon taking possession of any bank, the director shall forthwith give written notice thereof to all persons having possession of any assets of such corporation. No person knowing of the taking of such possession by the director shall have a lien or charge for any payment thereafter advanced or clearance thereafter made or liability thereafter incurred against any of the assets of such corporation.

[ 2014 c 37 s 226; 1994 c 92 s 110; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.040. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 61; 1915 c 98 s 2; RRS s 3268. Formerly RCW 30.44.040.]